Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-2910
Required information.

A limited cooperative association shall maintain in a record at its principal office the following information:

(1) A current list showing the full name and last-known street address, mailing address, and term of office of each director and officer;

(2) A copy of the initial articles of organization and all amendments to and restatement of the articles, together with signed copies of any powers of attorney under which any articles, amendments, or restatement has been signed;

(3) A copy of the initial bylaws and all amendments to or restatement of the bylaws;

(4) A copy of any filed articles of merger or consolidation;

(5) A copy of any audited financial statements;

(6) A copy of the minutes of meetings of members and records of all actions taken by members without a meeting for the three most recent years;

(7) A current list showing the full name and last-known street and mailing addresses, separately identifying the patron members, in alphabetical order, and the investor members, in alphabetical order;

(8) A copy of the minutes of directors' meetings and records of all actions taken by directors without a meeting for the three most recent years;

(9) A record stating:

(a) The amount of cash contributed and agreed to be contributed by each member;

(b) A description and statement of the agreed value of other benefits contributed and agreed to be contributed by each member;

(c) The times at which, or events on the happening of which, any additional contributions agreed to be made by each member are to be made; and

(d) For a person that is both a patron member and an investor member, a specification of the interest the person owns in each capacity; and

(10) A copy of all communications in a record to members as a group or to any class of members as a group for the three most recent years.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 3.